Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 7

Office of Trustee

35-15-701. Accepting or declining trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

By substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may reject the trusteeship. A designated trustee who does not accept the trusteeship within a reasonable time after knowing of the designation and the assets comprising the trust is deemed to have rejected the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may:

Act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a rejection of the trusteeship to the settlor or, if the settlor is dead or lacks capacity, to a qualified beneficiary; and

Inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 51.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence., 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 2, 9, 17.

35-15-702. Trustee's bond.

A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee's duties only if the court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not dispensed with the requirement.

The court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. The court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

A state or national bank, savings institution, or trust company authorized to exercise fiduciary powers and regulated by the office of the comptroller of the currency, office of thrift supervision, the department of financial institutions or equivalent state banking supervisors need not give bond, even if required by the terms of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 52.

35-15-703. Cotrustees.

Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by majority decision.

If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee's function unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to another trustee.

If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function the settlor reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a trustee who does not join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.

Each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:

Prevent a cotrustee from committing a serious breach of trust; and

Compel a cotrustee to redress a serious breach of trust.

A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the trustees and who notified any cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action is a serious breach of trust.

A trustee shall keep each cotrustee and any other fiduciary reasonably informed about the administration of the trust, to the extent the trustee has knowledge that each such cotrustee or other fiduciary does not have such knowledge of the trustee's actions, or regarding other material information or the availability of such information, related to the administration of the trust that would be reasonably necessary for each such cotrustee or other fiduciary to perform such person's duties as a trustee or other fiduciary of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 53; 2013, ch. 390, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section contains most but not all of the Code's provisions on cotrustees. Other provisions relevant to cotrustees include sections T.C.A. § 35-15-704 (vacancy in trusteeship need not be filled if cotrustee remains in office), T.C.A. § 35-15-705 (notice of resignation must be given to cotrustee), T.C.A. § 35-15-706 (lack of cooperation among cotrustees as ground for removal), T.C.A. § 35-15-707 (obligations of resigning or removed trustee), , and T.C.A. § 35-15-1013 (whether all or less than all trustees are required to exercise signature authority to exercise various powers).

Cotrustees are appointed for a variety of reasons. Having multiple decision makers can serve as a safeguard against eccentricity or misconduct. Cotrustees are often appointed to gain the advantage of differing skills, perhaps a financial institution for its permanence and professional skills, and a family member to maintain a personal connection with the beneficiaries. On other occasions, cotrustees are appointed to make certain that all family lines are represented in the trust's management.

Cotrusteeship should not be called for without careful reflection. Division of responsibility among cotrustees is of-ten confused, the accountability of any individual trustee is uncertain, obtaining consent of all trustees can be burden-some, and unless an odd number of trustees is named deadlocks requiring court resolution can occur. Potential problems can be reduced by addressing division of responsibilities in the terms of the trust. Like the other sections of this chapter, this section is freely subject to modification in the terms of the trust. See T.C.A. § 35-15-105.

Much of this section is based on comparable provisions of the Restatement of Trusts, although with extensive modifications. Reference should also be made to ERISA section 405 ( 29 U.S.C. § 1105), which in recent years has been the statutory base for the most significant case law on the powers and duties of cotrustees.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-703.

Subsection (a) is in accord with Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 39 (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999), which rejects the common law rule, followed in earlier Restatements, requiring unanimity among the trustees of a private trust. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 194 (1959). This section is consistent with the prior Restatement rule applicable to charitable trusts, which allowed for action by a majority of trustees. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 383 (1959).

Under subsection (b), a majority of the remaining trustees may act for the trust when a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship. T.C.A. § 35-15-704 provides that a vacancy in a cotrusteeship need be filled only if there is no trustee remaining in office.

Pursuant to subsection (c), a cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee function unless the cotrustee has properly delegated performance to another cotrustee, or the cotrustee is unable to participate due to temporary incapacity or disqualification under other law. Other laws under which a cotrustee might be disqualified include federal securities law and the ERISA prohibited transactions rules. Subsection (d) authorizes a cotrustee to assume some or all of the functions of another trustee who is unavailable to perform duties as provided in subsection (c).

Subsection (e) addresses the extent to which a trustee may delegate the performance of functions to a cotrustee. The standard differs from the standard for delegation to an agent as provided in T.C.A. § 35-15-807 because the two situations are different. T.C.A. § 35-15-807, which is substantially similar to T.C.A. § 35-14-111 of the Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002, recognizes that many trustees are not professionals. Consequently, trustees should be encouraged to delegate functions they are not competent to perform. Subsection (e) is premised on the assumption that the settlor selected cotrustees for a specific reason and that this reason ought to control the scope of a permitted delegation to a cotrustee. Subsection (e) prohibits a trustee from delegating to another trustee functions the settlor reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. The exact extent to which a trustee may delegate functions to another trustee in a particular case will vary depending on the reasons the settlor decided to appoint cotrustees. The better practice is to address the division of functions in the terms of the trust, as allowed by T.C.A. § 35-15-105. Subsection (e) is based on language derived from Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 171 (1959). This section of the Restatement Second, which applied to delegations to both agents and cotrustees, was superseded, as to delegation to agents, by Restatement (Third) of Trusts: Prudent Investor Rule § 171 (1992).

By permitting the trustees to act by a majority, this section contemplates that there may be a trustee or trustees who might dissent. Trustees who dissent from the acts of a cotrustee are in general protected from liability. Subsection (f) protects trustees who refused to join in the action. Subsection (h) protects a dissenting trustee who joined the action at the direction of the majority, such as to satisfy a demand of the other side to a transaction, if the trustee expressed the dissent to a cotrustee at or before the time of the action in question. However, the protections provided by subsections (f) and (h) no longer apply if the action constitutes a serious breach of trust. In that event, subsection (g) may impose liability against a dissenting trustee for failing to take reasonable steps to rectify the improper conduct. The responsibility to take action against a breaching cotrustee codifies the substance of sections 184 and 224 of the Restatement (Second) of Trusts (1959).

A cotrustee can always seek declaratory relief under T.C.A. § 29-14-105 when a deadlock exists among trustees or when a dissenting cotrustee fears that an action or omission of the majority could result in potential liability to the co-trustee.

A provision similar to T.C.A. § 35-15-703(i) is not contained in the Uniform Trust Code. Subsection (i) requires all trustees to keep all other fiduciaries reasonably informed about the administration of the trust to the extent such other fiduciaries do not have such knowledge. This requirement assures that all such fiduciaries have the material information necessary to perform their respective duties.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-704. Vacancy in trusteeship — Appointment of successor.

A vacancy in a trusteeship occurs if:

A person designated as trustee rejects the trusteeship;

A person designated as trustee cannot be identified or does not exist;

A trustee resigns;

A trustee is disqualified or removed;

A trustee dies; or

A conservator is appointed for an individual serving as trustee.

If one (1) or more cotrustees remain in office, a vacancy in a trusteeship need not be filled. A vacancy in a trusteeship must be filled if the trust has no remaining trustee.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a noncharitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

By a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

By a person appointed by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries; or

By a person appointed by the court.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a charitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

By a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

By a person selected by the charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of the trust if the attorney general does not affirmatively object within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the person selected; or

By a person appointed by the court.

Whether or not a vacancy in a trusteeship exists or is required to be filled, the court may appoint an additional trustee or special fiduciary whenever the court considers the appointment necessary for the administration of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 54; 2007, ch. 24, § 26.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence., 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 5, 9.

35-15-705. Resignation of trustee.

A trustee may resign:

Upon at least thirty (30) days' notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or

With the approval of the court.

In approving a resignation, the court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee's bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee's resignation.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 55.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence., 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 9.

35-15-706. Removal of trustee.

The settlor, a cotrustee, or a qualified beneficiary may request the court to remove a trustee, or a trustee may be removed by the court on its own initiative.

The court may remove a trustee if:

The trustee has committed a serious breach of trust;

Lack of cooperation among cotrustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

Because of unfitness, unwillingness, or persistent failure of the trustee to administer the trust effectively, the court determines that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of the beneficiaries; or

There has been a substantial change of circumstances or removal is requested by all of the qualified beneficiaries, the court finds that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of all of the beneficiaries and is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, and a suitable cotrustee or successor trustee is available.

Pending a final decision on a request to remove a trustee, or in lieu of or in addition to removing a trustee, the court may order such appropriate relief under § 35-15-1001(b) as may be necessary to protect the trust property or the interests of the beneficiaries.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 56.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 2, 9, 17; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 13.

35-15-707.
Delivery of property by former trustee — Petition for approval of accountings and release and discharge from liability.

Unless a cotrustee remains in office or the court otherwise orders, and until the trust property is delivered to a successor trustee or other person entitled to it, a trustee who has resigned or been removed has the duties of a trustee and the powers necessary to protect the trust property.

A trustee who has resigned or been removed shall, within a reasonable time, deliver the trust property within the trustee's possession to the cotrustee, successor trustee, or other person entitled to it.

Prior to delivering the trust property within the trustee's possession to the co-trustee, successor trustee, or other person entitled to it, a trustee who has resigned or been removed shall have the right and authority to petition the court for approval of its accountings and a release and discharge from all liability related to such trust as allowed under § 35-15-205.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 57; 2007, ch. 24, § 27; 2019, ch. 340, § 10.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

35-15-708. Compensation of trustees, trust advisors and trust protectors.

If the terms of a trust do not specify a trustee's, trust advisor's or trust protector's compensation, and if the settlor, if living, or otherwise a majority of the qualified beneficiaries as defined in § 35-15-103(24)(A), have not otherwise agreed, a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

If the terms of a trust specify a trustee's, trust advisor's or trust protector's compensation, the trustee, trust advisor or trust protector is entitled to be compensated as specified in the trust, but the court may allow more or less compensation if:

The duties of the trustee, trust advisor or trust protector are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

The compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

Factors for the court to consider in deciding upon a trustee's, trust advisor's or trust protector's compensation shall include the size of the trust, the nature and number of the assets, the income produced, the time and responsibility required, the expertise required, any management or sale of real property or closely held business interests, any involvement in litigation to protect trust property, and other relevant factors.

Subject to the court's authority as provided in subsection (b), regardless of its form of entity, the fees set forth in the published fee schedule of a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector that is regulated by the department of financial institutions, the equivalent regulatory agency of another state, the office of the comptroller of the currency or the office of thrift supervision shall be presumed to be reasonable, unless otherwise provided by the terms of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 58; 2013, ch. 390, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 9.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-708.

Subsection (a) establishes a standard of reasonable compensation. Such standard applies to the extent that the terms of a trust, or a settlor if living, or otherwise a majority of the qualified beneficiaries as defined in T.C.A. 35-15-103 have not otherwise agreed.

Relevant factors in determining the standard of reasonable compensation, as specified in the Restatement, include the custom of the community; the trustee's skill, experience, and facilities; the time devoted to trust duties; the amount and character of the trust property; the degree of difficulty, responsibility and risk assumed in administering the trust, including in making discretionary distributions; the nature and costs of services rendered by others; and the quality of the trustee's performance. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. c (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Re-statement (Second) of Trusts § 242 cmt. b (1959).

Because “trustee” as defined in T.C.A. § 35-15-103 includes not only an individual trustee but also cotrustees, each trustee, including a cotrustee, is entitled to reasonable compensation under the circumstances. The fact that a trust has more than one trustee does not mean that the trustees together are entitled to more compensation than had either acted alone. Nor does the appointment of more than one (1) trustee mean that the trustees are eligible to receive the compensation in equal shares. The total amount of the compensation to be paid and how it will be divided depend on the totality of the circumstances. Factors to be considered include the settlor's reasons for naming more than one (1) trustee and the level of responsibility assumed and exact services performed by each trustee. Often the fees of cotrustees will be in the aggregate higher than the fees for a single trustee because of the duty of each trustee to participate in administration and not delegate to a cotrustee duties the settlor expected the trustees to perform jointly. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. i (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999). The trust may benefit in such cases from the enhanced quality of decision-making resulting from the collective deliberations of the trustees.

The same standard of reasonable compensation that applies to trustees and to cotrustees applies to trust protectors, trust advisors and any other fiduciary.

In setting compensation, the services actually performed and responsibilities assumed by the trustee should be closely examined. A downward adjustment of fees may be appropriate if a trustee has delegated significant duties to agents, such as the delegation of investment authority to outside managers. See T.C.A. § 35-15-807 (delegation by trustee). On the other hand, a trustee with special skills, such as those of a real estate agent, may be entitled to extra compensation for performing services that would ordinarily be delegated. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. d (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 242 cmt. d (1959).

Similarly, in setting compensation for any fiduciary serving under a directed trust, the powers held and duties owed, the services actually performed and responsibilities assumed by any fiduciary, as well as the extent to which such fiduciary is an excluded fiduciary should be closely examined and adjusted accordingly.

Financial institution trustees normally base their fees on published fee schedules. Published fee schedules are subject to the same standard of reasonableness under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code as are other methods for computing fees. The courts have generally upheld published fee schedules but this is not automatic. Among the more litigated topics is the issue of termination fees. Termination fees are charged upon termination of the trust and sometimes upon transfer of the trust to a successor trustee. Factors relevant to whether the fee is appropriate include the actual work performed; whether a termination fee was authorized in the terms of the trust; whether the fee schedule specified the circumstances in which a termination fee would be charged; whether the trustee's overall fees for administering the trust from the date of the trust's creation, including the termination fee, were reasonable; and the general practice in the community regarding termination fees. Because significantly less work is normally involved, termination fees are less appropriate upon transfer to a successor trustee than upon termination of the trust. For representative cases, see Cleveland Trust Co. v. Wilmington Trust Co., 258 A.2d 58 (Del. 1969); In re Trusts Under Will of Dwan, 371 N.W. 2d 641 (Minn. Ct. App. 1985); Mercer v. Merchants National Bank, 298 A.2d 736 (N.H. 1972); In re Estate of Payson, 562 N.Y.S. 2d 329 (Surr. Ct. 1990); In re Indenture Agreement of Lawson, 607 A. 2d 803 (Pa. Super. Ct. 1992); In re Estate of Ischy, 415 A.2d 37 (Pa. 1980); Memphis Memorial Park v. Planters National Bank, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2978 (May 7, 1986); In re Trust of Sensenbrenner, 252 N.W. 2d 47 (Wis. 1977).

This Code does not take a specific position on whether dual fees may be charged when a trustee hires its own law firm to represent the trust. The trend is to authorize dual compensation as long as the overall fees are reasonable. For a discussion, see Ronald C. Link, Developments Regarding the Professional Responsibility of the Estate Administration Lawyer: The Effect of the Model Rules of Professional Conduct, 26 Real Prop. Prob. & Tr. J. 1, 22-38 (1991).

Subsection (b) permits the terms of the trust to override the reasonable compensation standard, subject to the court's inherent equity power to make adjustments downward or upward in appropriate circumstances. Compensation provisions should be drafted with care. Common questions include whether a provision in the terms of the trust setting the amount of the trustee's compensation is binding on a successor trustee, whether a dispositive provision for the trustee in the terms of the trust is in addition to or in lieu of the trustee's regular compensation, and whether a dispositive provision for the trustee is conditional on the person performing services as trustee. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. e (Tentative Draft No.2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 242 cmt. f (1959).

The preceding paragraph also applies to any fiduciary serving under a directed trust.

Compensation may be set by agreement. A trustee may enter into an agreement with the settlor or a majority of the qualified beneficiaries for lesser or increased compensation, although an agreement increasing compensation is not binding on a nonconsenting beneficiary. See T.C.A. § 35-15-111 (matters that may be the resolved by nonjudicial settlement). See also Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. f (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 242 cmt. i (1959). A trustee may also agree to waive compensation and should do so prior to rendering significant services if concerned about possible gift and income taxation of the compensation accrued prior to the waiver. See Rev. Rul. 66-167, 1966-1 C.B. 20. See also Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. g (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 242 cmt. j (1959).

The preceding paragraph also applies to any fiduciary serving under a directed trust.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-709. Reimbursement of expenses.

A trustee, trust advisor or trust protector is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with interest as appropriate, for:

Expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust; and

To the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust, expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

An advance, either by the trustee, trust advisor or trust protector or by a person named in § 35-15-701(c)(1), of money for the protection of the trust gives rise to a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement with reasonable interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 59; 2013, ch. 390, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-709.

A trustee has the authority to expend trust funds as necessary in the administration of the trust, including expenses incurred in the hiring of agents. See T.C.A. § 35-15-807 (delegation by trustee) and T.C.A. § 35-15-816 (trustee to pay expenses of administration from trust).

Subsection (a)(1) clarifies that a trustee is entitled to reimbursement from the trust for incurring expenses within the trustee's authority. The trustee may also withhold appropriate reimbursement for expenses before making distributions to the beneficiaries. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. b (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 244 cmt. b (1959). A trustee is ordinarily not entitled to reimbursement for incurring unauthorized expenses. Such expenses are normally the personal responsibility of the trustee.

As provided in subdivision (a)(2), a trustee is entitled to reimbursement for unauthorized expenses only if the unauthorized expenditures benefitted the trust The purpose of this provision, which is derived from Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 245 (1959), is not to ratify the unauthorized conduct of the trustee, but to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust. Given this purpose, a court, on appropriate grounds, may delay or even deny reimbursement for expenses which benefitted the trust. Appropriate grounds include: (1) whether the trustee acted in bad faith in incurring the expense; (2) whether the trustee knew that the expense was inappropriate; (3) whether the trustee reasonably believed the expense was necessary for the preservation of the trust estate; (4) whether the expense has resulted in a benefit; and (5) whether indemnity can be allowed without defeating or impairing the purposes of the trust. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 245 cmt. g (1959).

Subsection (b) implements T.C.A. § 35-15-802(k)(5), which creates an exception to the duty of loyalty for advances by the trustee for the protection of the trust if the transaction is fair to the beneficiaries.

Reimbursement under this section may include attorney's fees and expenses incurred by the trustee in defending an action. However, a trustee is not ordinarily entitled to attorney's fees and expenses if it is determined that the trustee breached the trust. See 3A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts § 245 (4th ed. 1988).

All of the above provisions also apply to trust advisors, trust protectors and other fiduciaries serving under a directed trust.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-710. Directed trusts.

If the terms of the trust, an agreement of the qualified beneficiaries, or a court order requires a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector to follow the direction of a trust advisor or trust protector, and the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector acts in accordance with such direction, then the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector so directed shall be treated as an excluded fiduciary.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section details when a fiduciary serving under a directed trust will be an excluded fiduciary as such is defined in 35-15-103.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-711. Directed trusts; accepting or declining fiduciary appointment.

A trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, such cotrustee already being provided for in § 35-15-701(a), may accept its appointment as such respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under § 35-15-701(a).

A trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, such cotrustee already being provided for in § 35-15-701(b), may reject its appointment as such respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under § 35-15-701(b).

A trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, such cotrustee already being provided for in § 35-15-701(c), may, without accepting its appointment as such respective fiduciary, carry out the appropriate activities relative to such respective fiduciary as are provided for a trustee under § 35-15-701(c).

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section deals with accepting or declining fiduciary appointments when such fiduciary is serving under a directed trust. It is analogous to T.C.A. § 35-15-701.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-712. Directed trusts; fiduciary's bond.

Section 35-15-702 applies to trust advisors, trust protectors or other fiduciaries other than cotrustees, such cotrustees already being provided for in § 35-15-702.

When exercising its powers under this section, the court shall consider the powers, duties and liabilities relative to such respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of such respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section deals with a fiduciary’s bond when such fiduciary is serving under a directed trust. It is analogous to T.C.A. § 35-15-702. It directs a court to consider the respective powers and duties held by a fiduciary, as well as the extent to which such fiduciary is a excluded fiduciary, when determining matters related to fiduciary bonds.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.